Hawaii statutes.
[§206M-20] Construction of this chapter.
The powers conferred by this chapter shall be in addition and supplemental to
other powers conferred by any other law. This chapter shall constitute and be
enabling legislation for the development corporation, as an agency and
instrumentality of the State, to issue special purpose revenue bonds in
accordance with the provisions of the Constitution of the State of Hawaii and
this chapter. Insofar as the provisions of this chapter are inconsistent with
the provisions of any other law, this chapter shall be controlling. [L 1983, c
152, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol04_Ch0201-0257
Next